Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,118
Modification or amendment of application; required; when.

(1) Any modification or amendment to the items described in section 44-32,117 shall be submitted to the director for his or her approval prior to the effectuation of the modification or amendment.

(2) Any modification or amendment shall be deemed approved unless disapproved within thirty days, except that the director may postpone the action for such further time, not exceeding an additional thirty days, as necessary for proper consideration.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 27;

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 89.